Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1119
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the director may appeal the order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 19, p. 1794;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 12.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.